Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-204.01
Bingo card, defined.

Bingo card means:

(1) In the case of seventy-five-number bingo, a disposable paper bingo card, a facsimile of a bingo card electronically displayed on a bingo card monitoring device, or a reusable hard bingo card or shutter card, which has letters and numbers preprinted or predetermined by a manufacturer and which:

(a) Contains five columns with five squares in each column;

(b) Identifies the five columns from left to right by the letters B-I-N-G-O; and

(c) Contains in each square, except for the center square identified as "free", one number from a pool of seventy-five numbers;

(2) In the case of ninety-number bingo, a disposable paper bingo card or facsimile of a bingo card electronically displayed on a bingo card monitoring device which has numbers preprinted or predetermined by a manufacturer and which:

(a) Contains six faces with each face containing twenty-seven squares arranged in nine columns of three squares each; and

(b) Contains in fifteen squares of each face a number from one to ninety which is not repeated on the same card; or

(3) In the case of bingo conducted utilizing song titles, musical artists, or music genres, a disposable paper bingo card, a facsimile of a bingo card electronically displayed on a bingo card monitoring device, or a reusable hard bingo card or shutter card, which has song titles, musical artists, or music genres preprinted or predetermined and which:

(a) Contains five columns with five squares in each column; and

(b) Contains in each square, except for the center square identified as "free", one song title, musical artist, or music genre from a pool of seventy-five song titles, musical artists, or music genres.

The department may approve variations to the card formats described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section if such variations result in a bingo game which is conducted in a manner that is consistent with section 9-204.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 12.
July 1, 2026